South Dakota, session 2026, SB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 41-11-5.5 be AMENDED:
41-11-5.5. A nonprofit organization may host a special pheasant hunt in which
disabled veterans and Purple Heart recipients of the armed forces of the United States
may participate. The special pheasant hunt may be held during the private shooting
preserve season, pursuant to § 41-10-11. No fee may be charged to participants in the
hunt, by the state or the sponsoring organization.
The Game, Fish and Parks Commission shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter
1-26, to administer the special pheasant hunts authorized in this section.
For the purposes of this section, "disabled veteran" means a veteran of the armed
forces of the United States who:
(1) Has been adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as being
twenty percent or more disabled due to a service-connected disability; or
(2) Is designated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to receive
Special Monthly Compensation Level K pursuant to 38 U.S.C. § 1114 (January 1,
2026).

26.281.11 2 131
An Act to revise the season in which a nonprofit organization may host a special pheasant
hunt for disabled veterans and Purple Heart recipients.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 131
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 131 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB131 ENROLLED